North Carolina, session 2025, SB901.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-1209.100(c) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(2a) Develop and update, as necessary, an interactive presentation on the legal,
medical, and emotional consequences of youth gun possession, substance
abuse, gun violence, and gun safety for students in grade seven and grade nine.
The Center shall provide training and materials for the presentation to all local
school administrative units and shall provide training and materials to any
other public school unit which requests to voluntarily give the presentation."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(73) Duty to Provide Presentation on Consequences of Gun Use. – Each local
school administrative unit shall provide a presentation in accordance with
G.S. 143B-1209.100(c)(2a) to all students in grade seven and grade nine. No
later than 14 days prior to the date on which the presentation is to be given,
the local school administrative unit shall ensure that all parents of students
that will be receiving the presentation are given notice of the presentation and
the opportunity to opt the student out of receiving the presentation."
SECTION 3. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Center for Safer Schools the sum of nine hundred thousand dollars
($900,000) in recurring funds to provide training and materials to enable local school
administrative units and other voluntary public school units to give a presentation on the
consequences of gun use to students in grade seven and grade nine in accordance with
G.S. 143B-1209.100(c)(2a), as enacted by this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026. Section 2 of this act applies
beginning with the 2027-2028 school year.
*S901-v-1*